Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-10]
Defense. [(a)] It is a defense to any action brought pursuant
to this chapter that the person who possessed, distributed, or facilitated the
marketing or distribution of a dangerous or harmful drug did so under authority
of law as a practitioner, as an ultimate user of the drug pursuant to a lawful
prescription, or as a person otherwise authorized by law.

[(b)] A law
enforcement officer or agency, the State, or a person acting at the direction
of a law enforcement officer or agency or the State is not liable for
participating in the illegal drug market if the participation is in furtherance
of an official investigation. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next